Hawaii statutes.
[§527‑14] Disclaimer. A
beneficiary may disclaim all or part of the beneficiary's interest as provided
by chapter 526, the Uniform Disclaimer of Property Interests Act. [L 2011, c
173, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next